el: Συμβατό έγχορδο όργανο: Ακουστικό μπάσο; Ακουστική κιθάρα; Μπάντζο; Μπάσο; Κλασική κιθάρα; Ηλεκτρική κιθάρα; Ηλεκτρική κιθάρα με ταστιέρα; Μαντολίνο; Ημιακουστική κιθάρα; Γιουκαλίλι; Universal; Άλλο
en: Compatible string instrument: Acoustic bass guitar; Acoustic guitar; Banjo; Bass guitar; Classical guitar; Electric guitar; Lap steel guitar; Mandolin; Semi-acoustic guitar; Ukulele; Universal; Other
fi: Yhteensopiva jousisoitin: Akustinen bassokitara; Akustinen kitara; Banjo; Bassokitara; Klassinen kitara; Sähkökitara; Steel-kitara/sylikitara; Mandoliini; Puoliakustinen kitara; Ukulele; Yleinen; Muu
ru: Совместимый струнный инструмент: Акустическая бас-гитара; Акустическая гитара; Банджо; Бас-гитара; Классическая гитара; Электрогитара; Гитара на ножках; Мандолина; Полуакустическая гитара; Укулеле; Универсальный; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis húros hangszer: Akusztikus basszusgitár; Akusztikus gitár; Bendzsó; Basszusgitár; Klasszikus gitár; Elektromos gitár; Lap Steel gitár; Mandolin; Félakusztikus gitár; Ukulele; Általános; Egyéb
pt-PT: Instrumento de cordas compatível: Baixo acústico; Guitarra acústica; Banjo; Baixos; Guitarra clássica; Guitarra elétrica; Guitarra havaiana; Bandolim; Guitarra semiacústica; Ukulele; Universal; Outro
pt-BR: Instrumento de cordas compatível: Baixo acústico; Guitarra acústica; Banjo; Baixo; Guitarra clássicas; Guitarra elétrica; Guitarra havaiana; Bandolim; Guitarra semiacústica; Ukulele; Universal; Outro
tr: Uyumlu yaylı çalgı: Akustik bas gitar; Akustik gitar; Banjo; Bas gitar; Klasik gitar; Elektro gitar; Lap çelik gitar; Mandolin; Yarı akustik gitar; Ukulele; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljivo brenkalo: Akustična bas kitara; Akustična kitara; Bendžo; Bas kitara; Klasična kitara; Električna kitara; Drsna kitara; Mandolina; Polakustična kitara; Ukulele; Univerzalno; Drugo
fr: Instrument à cordes compatible: Guitare basse acoustique; Guitare acoustique; Banjo; Guitare basse; Guitare classique; Guitare électrique; Guitare Lap Steel; Mandoline; Guitare semi-acoustique; Ukulélé; Universel; Autre
cs: Kompatibilní strunný nástroj: Akustická basová kytara; Akustická kytara; Bendžo; Baskytara; Klasická kytara; Elektrická kytara; Havajská kytara; Mandolína; Poloakustická kytara; Ukulele; Univerzální; Jiné
th: เครื่องสายที่เข้ากันได้: กีตาร์เบสโปร่ง; กีตาร์โปร่ง; แบนโจ; กีตาร์เบส; กีตาร์คลาสสิก; กีตาร์ไฟฟ้า; กีต้าร์ Lap steel; แมนโดลิน; กีตาร์กึ่งโปร่ง; อูคูเลเล่; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ja: 使用可能な弦楽器: アコースティックベースギター; アコースティックギター; バンジョー; ベースギター; クラシックギター; エレキギター; ラップスチールギター; マンドリン; セミアコースティックギター; ウクレレ; ユニバーサル; その他
hr-HR: Kompatibilno žičano glazbalo: Akustična bas gitara; Akustična gitara; Bendžo; Bas-gitara; Klasična gitara; Električna gitara; Lap Steel gitara; Mandolina; Poluakustična gitara; Ukulele; Univerzalni; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilný sláčikový nástroj: Akustická basgitara; Akustická gitara; Banjo; Basgitara; Klasická gitara; Elektrická gitara; Gitara Lap steel; Mandolína; Poloakustická gitara; Ukulele; Univerzálny; Iné
ko: 호환 가능한 현악기: 어쿠스틱 베이스 기타; 어쿠스틱 기타; 밴조; 베이스 기타; 클래식 기타; 일렉트릭 기타; 랩 스틸 기타; 만돌린; 세미어쿠스틱 기타; 우쿨렐레; 범용; 기타
zh-CN: 兼容弦乐器: 原声贝斯吉他; 原声吉他; 班卓琴; 低音吉他; 古典吉他; 电吉他; 立式钢板吉他; 曼陀林; 半原生吉他; 尤克里里; 通用; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместим струнен инструмент: Акустична бас китара; Акустична китара; Банджо; Бас китара; Класическа китара; Електрическа китара; Lap steel китара; Мандолина; Полуакустична китара; Укулеле; Универсален; Други
es: Instrumento de cuerda compatible: Bajo acústico; Guitarra acústica; Banjo; Bajos; Guitarra clásica; Guitarra eléctrica; Guitarra hawaiana; Mandolina; Guitarra semiacústica; Ukelele; Universal; Otros
pl: Kompatybilny instrument smyczkowy: Akustyczna gitara basowa; Gitara akustyczna; Bandżo; Gitara basowa; Gitara klasyczna; Gitara elektryczna; Gitara ze stali kolanowej; Mandolina; Gitara półakustyczna; Ukulele; Uniwersalny; Inne
it: Strumento a corde compatibile: Basso acustico; Chitarra acustica; Banjo; Chitarra basso; Chitarra classica; Chitarra elettrica; Chitarra lap steel; Mandolino; Chitarra semiacustica; Ukulele; Universale; Altro
ro-RO: Instrument cu coarde compatibil: Chitară bas acustică; Chitară acustică; Banjo; Chitară bas; Chitară clasică; Chitară electrică; Chitară Lap Steel; Mandolină; Chitară semi-acustică; Ukulele; Universală; Altele
da: Kompatibelt strengeinstrument: Akustisk basguitar; Akustisk guitar; Banjo; Basguitar; Klassisk guitar; Elektrisk guitar; Lap steel-guitar; Mandolin; Semi-akustisk guitar; Ukulele; Universal; Andet
vi: Nhạc cụ dây tương thích: Đàn guitar bass acoustic; Đàn guitar mộc; Đàn banjo; Đàn guitar bass; Đàn guitar cổ điển; Đàn guitar điện; Đàn guitar thép; Đàn mandolin; Đàn guitar bán âm; Đàn ukulele; Phổ biến; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamas styginis instrumentas: Akustinė bosinė gitara; Akustinė gitara; Bandža; Bosinė gitara; Klasikinė gitara; Elektrinė gitara; Havajų gitara; Mandolina; Pusiau akustinė gitara; Ukulėlė; Universalus; Kita
de: Kompatibles Saiteninstrument: Akustische Bassgitarre; Akustikgitarre; Banjo; Bassgitarre; Klassische Gitarre; Elektrische Gitarre; Lap-Steel-Gitarre; Mandolin; Halbakustische Gitarre; Ukulele; Universell; Sonstiges
sv: Kompatibelt stränginstrument: Akustisk basgitarr; Akustisk gitarr; Banjo; Basgitarr; Klassisk gitarr; Elgitarr; Knästeelgitarr; Mandolin; Halvakustisk gitarr; Ukulele; Universell; Övrigt
zh-TW: 相容的弦樂器: 原聲貝斯吉他; 原聲吉他; 斑鳩琴; 電貝斯; 古典吉他; 電吉他; 滑音管吉他; 曼陀林; 半原聲吉他; 尤克萊利琴; 通用; 其他
nb: Kompatibelt strenginstrument: Akustisk bassgitar; Akustisk gitar; Banjo; Bassgitar; Klassisk gitar; Elektrisk gitar; Stålstrengsgitar; Mandolin; Semiakustisk gitar; Ukulele; Universal; Annet
nl: Compatibel snaarinstrument: Akoestische basgitaar; Akoestische gitaar; Banjo; Basgitaar; Klassieke gitaar; Elektrische gitaar; Lap steel-gitaar; Mandoline; Semi-akoestische gitaar; Ukulele; Universeel; Andere